Hawaii, session 2026, HB1588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  Noise Detection camera program §286-     Definitions. As used in this part, "department" means the department of transportation. §286-     Noise detection camera program.  (a) There is established the noise detection camera program within the department to install noise detection traffic cameras to address excessive traffic noise in urban areas. (b)  The department shall determine appropriate urban areas to implement and administer noise detection traffic cameras. §286-     Collaboration.  The department shall collaborate with the department of health to establish procedures for the implementation of the noise detection camera program. §286-     Enforcement. The department shall collaborate with the counties to establish procedures or memoranda of agreement to enforce applicable noise control ordinances. §286-     Annual report.  The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature regarding the noise detection camera program. §286-     Rules. The director of transportation shall adopt rules, including rules establishing appropriate decibel thresholds, pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this part." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the noise detection camera program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.